ro-RO: Starea tipăririi cardului de plasare: Gol (imprimabil); Gol (de scris pe el); Personalizat/imprimat la comandă; Preimprimat (nepersonalizat); Altele
nb: Utskriftsstatus for bordkort: Blank (kan skrives ut); Blank (for håndskrift); Personlig / spesialtrykket; Fortrykt (ikke personliggjort); Annet
pt-PT: Estado da impressão do cartão de lugar: Em branco (para imprimir); Em branco (para escrever); Impressão personalizada; Pré-impresso (não personalizado); Outro
hu: Ültetőkártya nyomtatási állapota: Üres (nyomtatható); Üres (írható); Személyre szabott / egyedileg nyomtatott; Előre nyomtatott (nem személyre szabott); Egyéb
ko: 플레이스 카드 인쇄 상태: 공란(인쇄 가능); 공란(수기 작성용); 개인 맞춤형/주문 인쇄; 사전 인쇄(개인 맞춤형 아님); 기타
th: วางสถานะการพิมพ์เฉพาะ: ว่าง (พิมพ์ได้); ว่าง (เขียนได้); สั่งทำ/พิมพ์ตามสั่ง; พิมพ์สำเร็จรูป (ไม่สั่งทำ); อื่นๆ
el: Κατάσταση εκτύπωσης καρτών θέσης: Κενό (εκτυπώσιμο); Κενό (για συμπλήρωση); Εξατομικευμένο/προσαρμοσμένη εκτύπωση; Προεκτυπωμένο (μη εξατομικευμένο); Άλλο
bg-BG: Статус на печат на картичката: Празни (за печат); Празни (за надписване); Персонализирани/Отпечатани по поръчка; Предварително отпечатани (неперсонализирани); Друго
sk-SK: Spôsob tlače menovky: Prázdne (na tlač); Prázdne (na písanie); Personalizované/potlačené na mieru; Predtlačené (nepersonalizované); Iné
da: Status for udskrivning af bordkort: Blank (til print); Blank (til at skrive i); Personliggjort/specialprintet; Forudprintet (ikke personliggjort); Andet
cs: Stav tisku karty místa: Prázdné (k potisku); Prázdné (k nadepsání); Personalizované / vlastní potisk; Předtištěné (bez personalizace); Jiné
tr: Yer kartı yazdırma durumu: Boş (yazdırılabilir); Boş (yazılabilir); Kişiselleştirilmiş/özel baskılı; Önceden basılmış (kişiselleştirilmemiş); Diğer
ja: 席札印刷状況: 無地 (印刷可能); 無地 (書き込み用); 名入れ/カスタム印刷; 印刷済み (名入れなし); その他
zh-TW: 座位卡印刷狀態: 空白 (可列印); 空白 (可手寫); 個人化/客製化列印; 預印 (非個人化); 其他
lt-LT: Vardo kortelės spausdinimo būsena: Tuščias (spausdinamas); Tuščias (rašomas ranka); Su asmenine informacija / pasirinktinis spausdinimas; Iš anksto atspausdintas (ne asmeninis); Kita
fi: Paikkakortin tulostuksen tila: Tyhjä (tulostettava); Tyhjä (kirjoitettava); Yksilöity / räätälöity painatus; Esipainettu (ei yksilöity); Muu
sv: Utskriftsstatus för platskort: Tom (utskrivbar); Tom (skrivs i för hand); Personanpassad/specialtryckt; Förtryckt (ej personanpassad); Övrigt
it: Stato di stampa del segnaposto: Vuoto (stampabile); Vuoto (scrivibile); Personalizzato/stampato su misura; Prestampato (non personalizzato); Altro
nl: Plaatskaart drukstatus: Blanco (bedrukbaar); Blanco (beschrijfbaar); Gepersonaliseerd/op maat bedrukt; Vooraf bedrukt (niet-gepersonaliseerd); Overig
zh-CN: 席位卡印刷状态: 空白（可打印）; 空白（可手写）; 个性化/定制打印; 预印（非个性化）; 其他
pl: Status nadruku winietki: Pusta (do zadrukowania); Pusta (do wpisania); Spersonalizowana / z niestandardowym nadrukiem; Z gotowym nadrukiem (niespersonalizowana); Inny
hr-HR: Status ispisa kartice mjesta: Prazno (za ispis); Prazno (za pisanje); Personalizirano / s prilagođenim tiskom; S prethodnim tiskom (nije personalizirano); Ostalo
ru: Статус печати карточки: Чистая (для печати); Чистая (для заполнения от руки); Персонализированная/индивидуальная печать; С готовым принтом (без персонализации); Другое
vi: Trạng thái in thẻ tên: Trống (có thể in); Trống (để viết); In tùy chỉnh/cá nhân hóa; In sẵn (không cá nhân hóa); Khác
en: Place card printing status: Blank (printable); Blank (write-in); Personalized/custom printed; Pre-printed (non-personalized); Other
fr: État d’impression du marque-place: Vierge (imprimable); Vierge (à remplir); Personnalisé/impression sur mesure; Préimprimé (non personnalisé); Autre
sl-SI: Status tiska sedežne kartice: Prazno (za tiskanje); Prazno (za vpisovanje); Prilagojeno/natisnjeno po meri; Vnaprej natisnjeno (neprilagojeno); Drugo
es: Estado de impresión de la tarjeta: En blanco (imprimible); En blanco (para escribir); Personalizada/impresión personalizada; Preimpresa (no personalizada); Otro
de: Druckstatus der Platzkarte: Leer (bedruckbar); Leer (beschreibbar); Personalisiert / Individuell bedruckt; Vorgedruckt (nicht personalisiert); Sonstige
pt-BR: Marcador de lugar status de impressão: Em branco (imprimível); Em branco (para escrever); Impressão personalizada; Pré-impresso (não personalizado); Outro